Illinois, session 104th, SB3909.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5adding Article 43 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/Art. 43 heading new)7ARTICLE 43. FIREARMS AND AMMUNITION 8    (30 ILCS 500/43-5 new)9    Sec. 43-5. Definition. As used in this Article:10    "Firearm" has the same meaning as defined in Section 1.1 11of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 12    "Firearm accessory" means a supplementary item designed to 13enhance a firearm's functionality, performance, or user 14experience or to modify a firearm or external gear used in 15conjunction with a firearm, including, but not limited to, the 16following: sights and optics; holsters; magazines; grips; 17slings; muzzle devices; suppressors; compensators; flash 18hiders; bipods; trigger upgrades and conversion devices; 19cleaning kits; and ammunition carriers. 20    "Firearm ammunition" has the same meaning as defined in 21Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act. 22    "Firearm precursor part" means any forging, casting,   SB3909- 2 -LRB104 17227 HLH 30648 b1printing, extrusion, machined body, or similar object that has 2reached a stage in manufacture where it may readily be 3completed, assembled, or converted to be used as a firearm 4frame or receiver or that is marketed or sold to the public to 5become or be used as a firearm frame or receiver once 6completed, assembled, or converted.  7    (30 ILCS 500/43-10 new)8    Sec. 43-10. Bidder, offeror, and contractor requirements; 9firearms.10    (a) In the case of a contract to supply a State agency with 11firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories, the 12bidder or offeror shall certify, before the contract is 13awarded, renewed, amended, or extended, that the bidder or 14offeror does not sell unserialized gun build kits or firearm 15precursor parts, including, but not limited to, unserialized 16firearms, unserialized unfinished frames, and unserialized 17unfinished receivers. 18    (b) A bidder or offeror seeking the award of a contract 19with a State agency for the procurement of firearms, firearm 20ammunition, or firearm accessories and a contractor who is 21awarded such a contract shall, during the public procurement 22process, on an annual basis, and upon request of the State 23agency, provide to the State agency: 24        (1) a copy of all required valid licenses, permits, or 25    certificates;   SB3909- 3 -LRB104 17227 HLH 30648 b1        (2) materials documenting the number of trace requests 2    the bidder, offeror, or contractor received from the 3    federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, and 4    Explosives during the previous 5 calendar years and the 5    time between the sale of a firearm subject to a trace 6    request and the receipt of the request; if a bidder or 7    offeror for a contract with a State agency for the 8    procurement of firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm 9    accessories or a party to such a contract is unable to 10    provide sufficient materials under this item (2), the 11    bidder, offeror, or contractor must provide to the State 12    agency a declaration explaining why it is unable to do so 13    and the steps it is taking to be able to do so within a 14    year; 15        (3) materials documenting any thefts or losses of 16    firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories from 17    the bidder's, offeror's, or contractor's premises for the 18    past 5 calendar years; if a bidder, offeror, or contractor 19    is unable to provide sufficient materials under this item 20    (3), then the bidder, offeror, or contractor must provide 21    to the State agency a declaration explaining why it is 22    unable to do so; 23        (4) copies of the 2 most recent inspection reports of 24    any inspection conducted by a federal, State, or local 25    agency focused on compliance with firearm or firearm 26    ammunition laws, including, but not limited to, any   SB3909- 4 -LRB104 17227 HLH 30648 b1    follow-up materials documenting administrative actions 2    taken by that agency; 3        (5) materials documenting any corrective actions taken 4    by the bidder, offeror, or contractor in response to a 5    finding of noncompliance or a violation of any federal, 6    State, or local firearm, firearm ammunition, or firearm 7    accessory law, rule, or other requirement, if applicable; 8    and 9        (6) an affirmation of compliance with all applicable 10    local, State, and federal laws related to the sale or 11    transfer of firearms, firearm ammunition, and firearms 12    accessories. 13    (c) A bidder or offeror seeking the award of a contract 14with a State agency for the procurement of firearms, firearm 15ammunition, or firearm accessories and a contractor who is 16awarded such a contract shall also, during the public 17procurement process, on an annual basis, and upon request of 18the State agency, provide to the State agency, in writing, any 19practices or policies, including, but not limited to, any 20amendments to those practices or policies made during the 21public procurement process, that are in effect or adopted by 22the bidder, offeror, or contractor, or required by any 23contract term that: 24        (1) prevent, detect, and screen for the transfer of 25    firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories to 26    straw purchasers or to firearm traffickers;   SB3909- 5 -LRB104 17227 HLH 30648 b1        (2) prevent, detect, and screen against the sale of 2    firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories to an 3    individual prohibited from possessing a firearm by 4    federal, State, or local law, or court order; 5        (3) prevent, detect, and document the theft or loss of 6    firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories; 7        (4) train employees to ensure compliance with all 8    applicable federal, State, and local firearms, firearm 9    ammunition, and firearm accessories laws and rules; 10        (5) assist law enforcement agencies in the 11    investigation and prevention of criminal access to 12    firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories; and 13        (6) operate a digital video surveillance system, as 14    described in the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act. 15    (d) Each State agency shall fully review, consider, and 16score all information and documentation supplied by bidders, 17offerors, and contractors under this Section as one factor in 18the bidding and award process. 19    (e) A State agency shall reject a bid from a bidder or 20offeror if the bidder or offeror has not complied with the 21provisions of this Section. 22    (f) A State agency shall not waive any of the requirements 23of this Section or make exigent or emergency purchases of 24firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm accessories. 25    (g) The Office of the Attorney General shall develop 26processes and procedures to implement this Section, which   SB3909- 6 -LRB104 17227 HLH 30648 b1shall include, but may not be limited to, a process to 2administer and assess a bidder's, offeror's, or contractor's 3compliance with the requirements of this Section as part of 4contract awards and renewals. 5    (h) The processes and procedures developed pursuant to 6this Section may include: 7        (1) a prequalification process to preapprove potential 8    bidder or offerors; and 9        (2) a scoring system to be used in contracting or 10    purchasing that evaluates a bidder's, offeror's, or 11    contractor's public safety values relating to firearms, 12    firearm ammunition, and firearm accessories. 13    (i) This Section applies to any contract for the 14procurement of firearms, firearm ammunition, or firearm 15accessories that a State agency solicits, enters into, awards, 16amends, renews, or extends on or after the effective date of 17this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.